New York, session 2025-2026, A5593.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 3641 of the education law, as 2 added by section 29-a of part B of chapter 57 of the laws of 2008, para- 3 graph a as amended by section 31 of part A of chapter 57 of the laws of 4 2009, is amended to read as follows: 5 3. Supplemental valuation impact grants. a. In addition to apportion- 6 ments otherwise provided by section thirty-six hundred two of this arti- 7 cle, for aid payable in the two thousand [eight] twenty-four--two thou- 8 sand [nine and two thousand nine--two thousand ten] twenty-five school 9 [years] year, the [amounts] amount specified in [paragraphs] paragraph c 10 [and d] of this subdivision shall be paid for the purpose of providing 11 additional funding for a school [districts] district which [have experi- 12 enced a significant financial hardship caused by an extraordinary change 13 in the taxable property valuation or extraordinary judgments resulting 14 from tax certiorari proceedings] has more than eighty-three percent of 15 its real property classified as tax exempt. 16 b. The purpose of this subdivision is to provide financial assistance 17 to a school [districts] district which [have experienced a significant 18 reduction in the taxable full value of the school district or extraor- 19 dinary tax certiorari judgments] has more than eighty-three percent of 20 its real property classified as tax exempt. The legislature finds that 21 a school [districts for which a judgment was made resulting from a tax 22 certiorari proceeding which is larger than the total budget of the 23 school district for school year two thousand seven--two thousand eight 24 or for school districts] district which [have observed a reduction of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04636-01-5 A. 5593 2 1 taxable real property of more than seventy-five percent between school 2 year two thousand five--two thousand six and school year two thousand 3 eight--two thousand nine] has more than eighty-three percent of its real 4 property classified as tax exempt during school year two thousand twen- 5 ty-four--two thousand twenty-five may benefit from temporary additional 6 assistance. 7 c. To the [Barker central school district, there shall be paid one 8 million three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000). Such grant shall be 9 payable to the Barker central school district in accordance with the 10 payment schedules contained in section thirty-six hundred nine-a of this 11 article, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary. 12 d. To the Haverstraw-Stony Point central school district, there shall 13 be paid two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000). Such 14 grant shall be payable to the Haverstraw-Stony Point central school 15 district in accordance with the payment schedules contained in section 16 thirty-six hundred nine-a of this article, notwithstanding any provision 17 of law to the contrary] West Valley central school district, there shall 18 be paid five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). Such grant shall be 19 payable to the West Valley central school district in accordance with 20 the payment schedules contained in section thirty-six hundred nine-a of 21 this article, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.